Utah statutes.
31A-2-208.   Publications.
(1)  The commissioner may prepare and distribute books, pamphlets, and other
publications relating to insurance.  Except as otherwise provided under this
title, the insurance commissioner may charge the cost of producing the
publications to those desiring to receive them.  Money collected from
subscription fees charged for these publications shall be deposited as
dedicated credits to be used solely for the production and mailing costs of
the publications.
(2)  The commissioner shall have the annual report required in Subsection
31A-2-207(5) printed in a form determined by him and in sufficient numbers to
meet all requests for copies.
(3)  The commissioner shall publish in his annual report an up-to-date chart
and explanation of the organization of his office, making clear the allocation
of responsibility and authority among the staff.  This document shall be
printed in sufficient numbers sufficient to meet all requests for copies.
